Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-203
Amendments proposed by Legislature; manner of submission.

At such election on the ballot of each elector voting shall be written or printed the words For proposed amendment to the Constitution, and Against proposed amendment to the Constitution, unless the Legislature in the resolution providing for the submission of a proposed amendment or amendments shall otherwise provide.

Laws 1877, § 3, p. 114;

R.S.1913, § 3700;

C.S.1922, § 3088;

Laws 1925, c. 112, § 3, p. 304;

C.S.1929, § 49-203;

R.S.1943, § 49-203.